District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-302.10

Application of chapter to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 210
as added June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(E), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 210 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).